dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ei Y 8
SFX Ei 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ei e o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ei e ęte/xPxE .
SFX Ei e ęta/xPxE .
SFX Ei e ęti/xPxE .
SFX Ei e ętu/xPxE .
SFX Ei e ętem/xPxE .
SFX Ei e ętom/xPxE .

SFX Ej Y 10
SFX Ej 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ej 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Ej ėc ci/xPxE .
SFX Ej ėc ca/xPxE .
SFX Ej ėc cev/xPxE .
SFX Ej ėc cu/xPxE .
SFX Ej ėc cah/xPxE .
SFX Ej ėc cam/xPxE .
SFX Ej ėc cem/xPxE .
SFX Ej ėc cami/xPxE .

SFX Ek Y 28
SFX Ek 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ek en no/xBxPxE .
SFX Ek en na/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nogo/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nų/xPxE .
SFX Ek en noj/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nom/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nomu/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nym/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nojų/xPxE .
SFX Ek en ni/xPxE .
SFX Ek en ne/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nyh/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nymi/xPxE .
SFX Ek en nějši/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšego/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšemu/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšim/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšem/zz .
SFX Ek en nějše/zz .
SFX Ek en nějša/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšų/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšej/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšejų/zz .
SFX Ek en nějših/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšim/zz .
SFX Ek en nějšimi/zz .
SFX Ek en něje/zz .

SFX El Y 13
SFX El 0 o .
SFX El 0 a .
SFX El 0 ogo .
SFX El 0 ų .
SFX El 0 oj .
SFX El 0 om .
SFX El 0 omu .
SFX El 0 ym .
SFX El 0 ojų .
SFX El 0 i .
SFX El 0 e .
SFX El 0 yh .
SFX El 0 ymi .

SFX Em Y 6
SFX Em 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Em y o/xPxBxO .
SFX Em ky ek/xPxE .
SFX Em y ah/xPxE .
SFX Em y am/xPxE .
SFX Em y ami/xPxE .

SFX En Y 8
SFX En a y .
SFX En a ų .
SFX En ka ek .
SFX En a ě .
SFX En 0 h .
SFX En 0 m .
SFX En a ojų .
SFX En 0 mi .

SFX Eo Y 6
SFX Eo 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Eo i o/xPxBxO .
SFX Eo i ov/xPxE .
SFX Eo i ah/xPxE .
SFX Eo i am/xPxE .
SFX Eo i ami/xPxE .

SFX Ep Y 11
SFX Ep 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ep 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ep ȯv vy/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv va/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv vov/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv vu/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv vah/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv vam/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv vom/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv vami/xPxE .
SFX Ep ȯv ve/xPxE .

SFX Eq Y 30
SFX Eq ti l .
SFX Eq ti la .
SFX Eq ti lo .
SFX Eq ti li .
SFX Eq ti h .
SFX Eq ti s .
SFX Eq ti 0 .
SFX Eq ti hmȯ .
SFX Eq ti ste .
SFX Eq yti ěh .
SFX Eq yti ěše .
SFX Eq yti ěhmȯ .
SFX Eq yti ěste .
SFX Eq yti ěhų .
SFX Eq yti ųdų .
SFX Eq yti ųdeš .
SFX Eq yti ųde .
SFX Eq yti ųdemȯ .
SFX Eq yti ųdete .
SFX Eq yti ųdųt .
SFX Eq yti ųď .
SFX Eq yti ųďmȯ .
SFX Eq yti ųďte .
SFX Eq ti vši .
SFX Eq ti vša .
SFX Eq ti vše .
SFX Eq i y .
SFX Eq i a .
SFX Eq i o .
SFX Eq ti ťje .

SFX Er Y 10
SFX Er 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Er ź zi/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 em/xPxE .
SFX Er 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX Es Y 9
SFX Es 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Es y o/xPxBxO .
SFX Es y e/xPxE .
SFX Es y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Es 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Es y om/xPxE .
SFX Es y omu/xPxE .
SFX Es 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Es 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX Et Y 6
SFX Et 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Et 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Et ec ca/xPxE .
SFX Et ec cu/xPxE .
SFX Et ec cem/xPxE .
SFX Et ec če/xPxE .

SFX Eu Y 9
SFX Eu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Eu y o/xPxBxO .
SFX Eu y i/xPxE .
SFX Eu y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Eu 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Eu y om/xPxE .
SFX Eu y omu/xPxE .
SFX Eu 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Eu 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX Ev Y 9
SFX Ev 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ev e e/xPxBxO .
SFX Ev e i/xPxE .
SFX Ev 0 go/xPxE .
SFX Ev e ih/xPxE .
SFX Ev 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ev 0 mu/xPxE .
SFX Ev e im/xPxE .
SFX Ev e imi/xPxE .

SFX Ew Y 21
SFX Ew 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ew ȯl l/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl ly/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 y/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl la/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl lov/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl lu/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl lah/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl lam/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl lom/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl lami/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Ew ȯl le/xPxE .
SFX Ew 0 e/xPxE .

SFX Ex Y 13
SFX Ex en no .
SFX Ex en na .
SFX Ex en nogo .
SFX Ex en nų .
SFX Ex en noj .
SFX Ex en nom .
SFX Ex en nomu .
SFX Ex en nym .
SFX Ex en nojų .
SFX Ex en ni .
SFX Ex en ne .
SFX Ex en nyh .
SFX Ex en nymi .

SFX Ey Y 12
SFX Ey -libo e-libo .
SFX Ey -libo a-libo .
SFX Ey -libo ego-libo .
SFX Ey -libo ų-libo .
SFX Ey -libo ej-libo .
SFX Ey -libo em-libo .
SFX Ey -libo emu-libo .
SFX Ey -libo im-libo .
SFX Ey -libo ejų-libo .
SFX Ey -libo i-libo .
SFX Ey -libo ih-libo .
SFX Ey -libo imi-libo .

SFX Ez Y 4
SFX Ez to-libo ego-libo .
SFX Ez to-libo em-libo .
SFX Ez to-libo emu-libo .
SFX Ez to-libo im-libo .

SFX FA Y 11
SFX FA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FA 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX FA ȯs si/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs sa/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs sov/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs su/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs sah/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs sam/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs som/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs sami/xPxE .
SFX FA ȯs se/xPxE .

SFX FB Y 13
SFX FB y-libo o-libo .
SFX FB y-libo a-libo .
SFX FB y-libo ogo-libo .
SFX FB y-libo ų-libo .
SFX FB y-libo oj-libo .
SFX FB y-libo om-libo .
SFX FB y-libo omu-libo .
SFX FB -libo m-libo .
SFX FB y-libo ojų-libo .
SFX FB y-libo i-libo .
SFX FB y-libo e-libo .
SFX FB -libo h-libo .
SFX FB -libo mi-libo .

SFX FC Y 12
SFX FC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX FC ę e/xPxBxO .
SFX FC 0 ta/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 te/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 t/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 ti/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 tu/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 tah/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 tam/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 tem/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 tom/xPxE .
SFX FC 0 tami/xPxE .

SFX FD Y 69
SFX FD ti l .
SFX FD ti la .
SFX FD ti lo .
SFX FD ti li .
SFX FD gti žų .
SFX FD gti žem .
SFX FD gti žeš .
SFX FD gti že .
SFX FD gti žemȯ .
SFX FD gti žete .
SFX FD gti žųt .
SFX FD gti žeh .
SFX FD gti žeše .
SFX FD gti žehmȯ .
SFX FD gti žeste .
SFX FD gti žehų .
SFX FD gti ži .
SFX FD gti žimȯ .
SFX FD gti žite .
SFX FD gti žųći .
SFX FD gti žųćego .
SFX FD gti žųćemu .
SFX FD gti žųćim .
SFX FD gti žųćem .
SFX FD gti žųćih .
SFX FD gti žųćimi .
SFX FD gti žųća .
SFX FD gti žųće .
SFX FD gti žemy .
SFX FD gti žemogo .
SFX FD gti žemomu .
SFX FD gti žemym .
SFX FD gti žemom .
SFX FD gti žemo .
SFX FD gti žema .
SFX FD gti žemų .
SFX FD gti žemoj .
SFX FD gti žemojų .
SFX FD gti žemi .
SFX FD gti žeme .
SFX FD gti žemyh .
SFX FD gti žemym .
SFX FD gti žemymi .
SFX FD gti žemo .
SFX FD ti ši .
SFX FD ti ša .
SFX FD ti še .
SFX FD gti ženy .
SFX FD gti ženogo .
SFX FD gti ženomu .
SFX FD gti ženym .
SFX FD gti ženom .
SFX FD gti ženi .
SFX FD gti žene .
SFX FD gti ženyh .
SFX FD gti ženymi .
SFX FD gti žena .
SFX FD gti ženų .
SFX FD gti ženoj .
SFX FD gti ženojų .
SFX FD gti ženo .
SFX FD gti žeńje/xPxE .
SFX FD gti žeńja/xPxE .
SFX FD gti žeńju/xPxE .
SFX FD gti žeńjem/xPxE .
SFX FD gti ženij/xPxE .
SFX FD gti žeńjam/xPxE .
SFX FD gti žeńjami/xPxE .
SFX FD gti žeńjah/xPxE .

SFX FE Y 78
SFX FE idti šėl .
SFX FE idti šla .
SFX FE idti šlo .
SFX FE idti šli .
SFX FE ti ų .
SFX FE ti em .
SFX FE ti eš .
SFX FE ti e .
SFX FE ti emȯ .
SFX FE ti ete .
SFX FE ti ųt .
SFX FE ti eh .
SFX FE ti eše .
SFX FE ti ehmȯ .
SFX FE ti este .
SFX FE ti ehų .
SFX FE ti i .
SFX FE ti imȯ .
SFX FE ti ite .
SFX FE ti ųći .
SFX FE ti ųćego .
SFX FE ti ųćemu .
SFX FE ti ųćim .
SFX FE ti ųćem .
SFX FE ti ųćih .
SFX FE ti ųćimi .
SFX FE ti ųća .
SFX FE ti ųće .
SFX FE ti omy .
SFX FE ti omogo .
SFX FE ti omomu .
SFX FE ti omym .
SFX FE ti omom .
SFX FE ti omo .
SFX FE ti oma .
SFX FE ti omų .
SFX FE ti omoj .
SFX FE ti omojų .
SFX FE ti omi .
SFX FE ti ome .
SFX FE ti omyh .
SFX FE ti omym .
SFX FE ti omymi .
SFX FE ti omo .
SFX FE idti šėvši .
SFX FE idti šėvšego .
SFX FE idti šėvšemu .
SFX FE idti šėvšim .
SFX FE idti šėvšem .
SFX FE idti šėvših .
SFX FE idti šėvšimi .
SFX FE idti šėvša .
SFX FE idti šėvšų .
SFX FE idti šėvšej .
SFX FE idti šėvšejų .
SFX FE idti šėvše .
SFX FE ti eny .
SFX FE ti enogo .
SFX FE ti enomu .
SFX FE ti enym .
SFX FE ti enom .
SFX FE ti eni .
SFX FE ti ene .
SFX FE ti enyh .
SFX FE ti enymi .
SFX FE ti ena .
SFX FE ti enų .
SFX FE ti enoj .
SFX FE ti enojų .
SFX FE ti eno .
SFX FE ti eńje/xPxE .
SFX FE ti eńja/xPxE .
SFX FE ti eńju/xPxE .
SFX FE ti eńjem/xPxE .
SFX FE ti enij/xPxE .
SFX FE ti eńjam/xPxE .
SFX FE ti eńjami/xPxE .
SFX FE ti eńjah/xPxE .
