dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
čile/Ei
děvėc/Ej
povinen/Ek
jegov/El
jejin/El
akne/Ei
cicky/Em
dȯlžen/Ek
bliznečky/Em
dvojka/En
gųsli/Eo
izzȯv/Ep
byti/Eq
byti/Eq
knęź/Er
ljuty/Es
marec/Et
ov/El
prědki/Eo
prisęžny/Eu
srědnje/Ev
učeny/Eu
vųgȯl/Ew
žaden/Ex
čij-libo/Ey
čto-libo/Ez
hujesȯs/FA
kaky-libo/FB
klienti/Eo
ktory-libo/FB
dvojčę/FC
prěnebrěgti/FD
odidti/FE
ptačę/FC
děvčę/FC
trojka/En
zloty/Es
nastrojky/Em
poddany/Eu
vitęź/Er
sųprųgi/Eo
narěčeny/Eu
svinec/Et
znajemy/Eu
vȯzråstly/Eu
doråstly/Eu
jasli/Eo
jaź/Er
kȯl/Ew
ljuby/Eu
pozȯv/Ep
zȯv/Ep
mnogonožky/Em
členistonogy/Eu
vnučę/FC
rędovy/Eu
mękkotěly/Eu
oseljenėc/Ej
sańky/Em
lųkostrělėc/Ej
afrikanėc/Ej
